Washington statutes.
RCW 33.16.080

Officers—Election—Service.

The board of directors of the association shall elect the officers named in the bylaws of the association, which officers shall serve at the pleasure of the board.

[ 1982 c 3 s 33; 1945 c 235 s 22; Rem. Supp. 1945 s 3717-141. Prior: 1939 c 98 s 2; 1933 c 183 ss 19, 20.]

NOTES:

Severability—1982 c 3: See note following RCW 33.04.002.